Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.440

Unlawful transport or delivery of cattle or horses.

It is unlawful for a person to transport or deliver cattle or horses to any destination other than the physical address of the destination designated on an inspection certificate, certificate of permit, or other transportation document when required by law or rule. The director may exempt cattle and horses from this requirement by rule.

[ 2011 c 204 s 14.]